Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-265
Option to block nine hundred services; charges; rules and regulations for involuntary blocks.

(1) Local exchange carriers shall offer to their subscribers, when technically feasible, an option to block intrastate nine hundred service. Blocking shall be offered at no charge on a one-time basis to all residential telephone subscribers. For blocking requests not within the one-time option and for commercial subscribers, the local exchange carrier may charge a reasonable one-time fee for each blocking request. Requests by subscribers to remove a previously blocked intrastate nine hundred service shall be in writing to the local exchange carrier. The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to implement procedures for local exchange carriers to place involuntary blocks on subscribers who fail to pay for pay-per-call services.

(2) For purposes of this section, technically feasible means when the existing switch will accommodate the request for blocking.

Laws 1993, LB 42, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1106;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 127.